Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Part 2

Regional Library Employees

10-5-201. Transfer of regional library system employees to department of state — Benefits and salaries.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, upon July 1, 1999, all full-time employees of the regional library system shall be transferred to the department of state and shall become employees of the office of the secretary of state in the manner provided by § 8-30-102(a).

Full-time employees of regional libraries transferred to the department of state shall be entitled to the same benefits enjoyed by other state employees, including retirement benefits, annual and sick leave, participation in any deferred compensation plan, eligibility for health and accident insurance, longevity pay, sick leave banks, bereavement leave, and all other such benefits.

Full-time employees of regional libraries transferred to the department of state shall retain their salaries existing at the time of transfer. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any benefits of any kind for state employees that were provided to the employees of a regional library during their employment by the regional library are hereby approved, validated and ratified from the date such benefits were conferred or given to the employees by any department, agency or institution of higher education of the state.

Acts 1999, ch. 205, § 7.

10-5-202. Department of state employees who were previously regional employees — Certification of entitlements.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any person currently employed by the department of state who was previously a regional employee shall be treated as a state employee as of the date of employment with the department of state and entitled to all benefits received by regional employees pursuant to this part.

The personnel officer or appointing authority of the employee of the regional library shall be responsible for certifying entitlement to such sick leave, annual leave, and longevity credit to the department of state.

Acts 1999, ch. 205, § 8.

10-5-203. Existing leave balances, longevity and retirement credit — Certification.

Upon joining as an employee of the state of Tennessee, pursuant to this part, regional library employees shall immediately be credited with their existing leave balances, longevity and retirement credit based on their accumulated years of service as regional library employees.

The personnel officer or appointing authority of the employee of the regional library is responsible for certifying the accumulated balances of sick leave, annual leave, and longevity credit to the department of state.

Acts 1999, ch. 205, § 9.

10-5-204. Status of regional library employees becoming employees of state — Contributions — Participation — Retirement system benefits — Credit for prior service.

Upon joining as employees of the state of Tennessee, regional library employees shall make the same contributions, participate in the same manner, and shall be eligible for the same benefits as state employees participating in the retirement system. Such employees shall be entitled to credit for such prior service with the regional library boards.

Acts 1999, ch. 205, § 10.

10-5-205. Admittance to state group insurance program.

Full-time regional library employees shall be admitted to the state group insurance program without proof of insurability.

Acts 1999, ch. 205, § 11.

10-5-206. “Full-time employee of a regional library board” defined.

For the purposes of this part, a full-time employee of a regional library board is one who has an annual schedule which includes at least one thousand six hundred (1,600) hours of employment.

Acts 1999, ch. 205, § 12.

10-5-105. Personnel — Applicable policies and regulations.